Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Part 18 Miscellaneous

7-1.2-1801.
Unauthorized assumption of corporate powers.

All individuals who assume to act as a corporation without authority so to do are jointly and severally liable for all debts and liabilities incurred or arising as a result of that action.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2.

7-1.2-1802.
Application to existing corporations organized under general acts.

The provisions of this chapter apply to all existing corporations organized under any general act of this state providing for the organization of corporations for a purpose or purposes for which a corporation might be organized under this chapter, where the power has been reserved to amend, repeal, or modify the act under which the corporation was organized and where the act is repealed by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2.

7-1.2-1803.
Application to foreign and interstate commerce.

The provisions of this chapter apply to commerce with foreign nations and among the several states only insofar as the provisions are permitted under the constitution of the United States.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2.

7-1.2-1804.
Applicability to corporations created by special acts.

The provisions of this chapter apply to all existing corporations previously or subsequently created by any special act of the general assembly of a kind that could be organized under this chapter, except insofar as the provisions are inconsistent with the provisions of any applicable special act passed after May 5, 1920, or with the provisions of any applicable special act passed that are not subject to amendment or repeal at the will of the general assembly. A corporation created by special act of the kind that could be organized under this chapter, but whose charter is not subject to amendment, repeal, or modification by the general assembly, may at a called meeting for the purpose, by a unanimous vote of its shareholders or members, adopt the provisions of this chapter upon the filing in the office of the secretary of state of a certified copy of the vote, attested by its president or vice president and its secretary or assistant secretary under its corporate seal, and the payment to the secretary of state of the fee prescribed by §

7-1.2-1602

. The corporation is subsequently governed in all respects by the provisions of this chapter and its charter shall subsequently be subject to amendment or repeal at the will of the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 130, § 1.